Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6772YC (1) 91 lh/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 602.1219 Judicial officer 1 performance information. 2 1. Each year, the state court administrator shall collect 3 and publish information related to each district court judge 4 including district associate judges, full-time associate 5 juvenile judges, and full-time associate probate judges. The 6 information must include but is not limited to all of the 7 following: 8 a. Pretrial discretion. 9 (1) The percentage of cases in which the judge set a bond 10 amount lower than the bond schedule promulgated pursuant to 11 section 804.21, subsection 5. 12 (2) The frequency with which a person is released on 13 the personâs own recognizance by the judge when the person 14 is arrested for a violent offense compared to a nonviolent 15 offense. 16 b. Sentencing outcomes. 17 (1) The frequency with which the judgeâs final sentence is 18 lower than the statutory recommendation or the prosecutorâs 19 recommendation. 20 (2) The number of times the judge grants a deferred 21 judgment, deferred sentence, or suspended sentence. 22 c. Appellate review. The number of times the judgeâs 23 rulings are reversed by the court of appeals or the supreme 24 court due to abuse of discretion or error of law. 25 d. Courtroom efficiency. 26 (1) The average time from the filing of a motion or 27 submission of a case for ruling to the judgeâs final ruling on 28 the motion or case. 29 (2) The number of cases the judge has disposed of compared 30 to the number of outstanding cases remain on the judgeâs 31 docket. 32 2. The judicial branch shall create and maintain an internet 33 site that includes all of the following features: 34 a. A search-by-county and search-by-name interface. 35 -1- LSB 6772YC (1) 91 lh/ns 1/ 2 H.F. _____ b. Each judgeâs performance information required under 1 subsection 1 along with the average performance statistics for 2 each judicial district. 3 c. A space where each judge may provide a personal statement 4 of no more than five hundred words explaining the judgeâs 5 judicial philosophy or addressing specific data trends. 6